Florida, session 2026, HB929.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 125.489, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
125.489 Ordinances, regulations, and policies concerning
chickees.—
(1) A county may not enact an ordinance, regulation, or
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb929 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 929 2026 Legislature
policy that prevents or has the effect of preventing a person
who is a member of the Miccosukee Tribe of Indians of Florida or
the Seminole Tribe of Florida from constructing a chickee, as
defined in s. 553.73(10)(i):
(a) In a side yard if the chickee is at least 10 feet from
the property line.
(b) Near another structure if the chickee is at least 10
feet from any other structure.
(2) A county may not enact an ordinance, regulation, or
policy concerning chickees that is more restrictive than federal
floodplain management regulations.
Section 2. Section 166.04845, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
166.04845 Ordinances, regulations, and policies concerning
chickees.—
(1) A municipality may not enact an ordinance, regulation,
or policy that prevents or has the effect of preventing a person
who is a member of the Miccosukee Tribe of Indians of Florida or
the Seminole Tribe of Florida from constructing a chickee, as
defined in s. 553.73(10)(i):
(a) In a side yard if the chickee is at least 10 feet from
the property line.
(b) Near another structure if the chickee is at least 10
feet from any other structure.
(2) A municipality may not enact an ordinance, regulation,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb929 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 929 2026 Legislature
or policy concerning chickees that is more restrictive than
federal floodplain management regulations.
Section 3. Paragraph (i) of subsection (10) of section
553.73, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
553.73 Florida Building Code.—
(10) The following buildings, structures, and facilities
are exempt from the Florida Building Code as provided by law,
and any further exemptions shall be as determined by the
Legislature and provided by law:
(i) Chickees constructed by the Miccosukee Tribe of
Indians of Florida or the Seminole Tribe of Florida. As used in
this paragraph, the term "chickee" means an open-sided wooden
hut that has a thatched roof of palm, or palmetto, or other
traditional materials; that may have a wooden deck;, and that
does not incorporate any electrical, plumbing, or other nonwood
features, except that a chickee may:
1. Incorporate nonwood fasteners, including, but not
limited to, nails, screws, bolts, nuts, washers, staples, and
hurricane straps.
2. Incorporate electrical or plumbing features in
accordance with a building permit for the incorporation of such
features.

A person who is not a member of the Miccosukee Tribe of Indians
of Florida or the Seminole Tribe of Florida and who constructs a
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb929 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 929 2026 Legislature
chickee in an attempt to assert an exemption from the Florida
Building Code commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.

With the exception of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (f), in
order to preserve the health, safety, and welfare of the public,
the Florida Building Commission may, by rule adopted pursuant to
chapter 120, provide for exceptions to the broad categories of
buildings exempted in this section, including exceptions for
application of specific sections of the code or standards
adopted therein. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services shall have exclusive authority to adopt by rule,
pursuant to chapter 120, exceptions to nonresidential farm
buildings exempted in paragraph (c) when reasonably necessary to
preserve public health, safety, and welfare. The exceptions must
be based upon specific criteria, such as under-roof floor area,
aggregate electrical service capacity, HVAC system capacity, or
other building requirements. Further, the commission may
recommend to the Legislature additional categories of buildings,
structures, or facilities which should be exempted from the
Florida Building Code, to be provided by law. The Florida
Building Code does not apply to temporary housing provided by
the Department of Corrections to any prisoner in the state
correctional system.
100 Section 4. Subsection (22) is added to section 633.202,
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb929 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 929 2026 Legislature
101 Florida Statutes, to read:
102 633.202 Florida Fire Prevention Code.—
103 (22)(a) As used in this subsection, the term "chickee" has
104 the same meaning as in s. 553.73(10)(i).
105 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a chickee
106 is exempt from the Florida Fire Prevention Code, including the
107 national fire codes and other national codes incorporated by
108 reference, if:
109 1. The chickee is at least 20 feet from another structure
110 subject to the Florida Building Code; or
111 2. The chickee otherwise implements fire-proofing measures
112 approved by a certified fire protection system contractor.
113 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb929 -00-er